North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 11. Grants.

§ 146-43.
Cutting timber on land before obtaining a grant.

If any person shall make an entry of any lands, and before perfecting title to same shall enter upon such lands and cut therefrom any wood, trees, or timber, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person found guilty under the provisions of this section shall further pay to the State double the value of the wood, trees, or timber taken from the land, and it shall be the duty of the solicitor of the district in which the land lies to sue for the same.

History.

1903, c. 272, s. 4; Rev., s. 3741; C.S., s. 7582; G.S., s. 146-51; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 1052; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 146-44.
Card index system for grants.

The Secretary of State shall install in his office a card index system for grants, and every warrant, plot, and survey that can be found shall be encased in separate envelopes. Each card and envelope shall show substantially the following:

County Acres Name Grant No. Issued Grant Book Page Entry No. Entered File No. Location Remarks

Click to view

Such grant books as are old and falling to pieces shall be recopied, and whenever any part of the record of a grant is partly gone or destroyed the Secretary of State shall restore same, if he can do so with accuracy from the description in the plot and survey upon which the grant was issued and original record made.

History.

1909, c. 505, ss. 1, 2, 3; C.S., s. 7584; G.S., s. 146-53; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-45.
Grant of Moore’s Creek Battlefield authorized.

In conjunction with an act of Congress relating to the establishment of the Moore’s Creek National Military Park (June 2, 1926, c. 448, s. 2, 44 Stat. 684; U. S. Code, Title 16, ss. 422-422(d)), the Governor of the State of North Carolina is hereby authorized to execute to the United States government a deed vesting the title to Moore’s Creek Battlefield, Pender County, in said United States government on behalf of the State of North Carolina, to preserve the same as an historical battlefield: Provided that the consent of the State of North Carolina to such acquisition by the United States is upon the express condition that the State of North Carolina shall so far retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over such battlefield as that all civil and criminal processes issued from the courts of the State of North Carolina may be executed thereon in like manner as if this authority had not been given: Provided further, that the title to said battlefield so conveyed to the United States shall revert to the State of North Carolina unless said land is used for the purpose for which it is ceded.

History.

1925, c. 40; 1927, c. 56; G.S., s. 146-54; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.